Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-148
Fees; schedule; failure to post; penalty.

All officers whose fees are prescribed in sections 33-101 to 33-147 are hereby required to make fair tables of their respective fees, and keep the same in their respective offices in some conspicuous place, for the inspection of all persons who shall have business in said offices. If any such officer shall neglect to keep a table of fees of his office as aforesaid, such officer shall, for each day of such neglect so to keep a table of fees of his office, forfeit and pay the sum of five dollars, to be recovered by action at law before the county court, for the use of the county in which the offense shall have been committed.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 31, p. 171;

R.S.1913, § 2473;

C.S.1922, § 2415;

C.S.1929, § 33-153;

R.S.1943, § 33-148;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 225.